Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
INTERSTATE ACTIONS
SECTION 1. Policy regarding  legal protections for reproductive or gender-affirming
health care activities.  (1) “Gender-affirming  treatment” and “reproductive health care” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 24.500.
(2) It is the policy of this state that people should be protected under state  law to engage
in the following activities related to reproductive health  care or gender-affirming treatment
that is provided by  a health care provider who is licensed in this state, who is acting within
the health care provider’s scope of practice and who provides or attempts to provide the
reproductive health care or gender-affirming treatment to  a patient who is physically located
in this state:
(a) The receipt or  attempted receipt of reproductive health care or gender-affirming
treatment that is lawful in this state.
(b) The provision or attempted provision of reproductive health care or  gender-affirming
treatment that is lawful in this state.
(c) The assistance or attempted assistance in the receipt or provision of reproductive
health care or gender-affirming treatment that is lawful in this state.
SECTION 2.
Nonfugitive extradition. (1) As used in this section, “legally-protected re-
productive or  gender-affirming health care activities” means one or more of the activities
described in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(2) Except  as required by federal law and notwithstanding ORS 133.767, the Governor of
this state may not surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other  state, a
person in this state  charged in such other state for engaging in legally-protected reproduc-
tive or gender-affirming health care activities if the Governor is not otherwise required to
surrender the person under ORS 133.747.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Cooperation with federal and interstate investigations. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) “Legally-protected reproductive or gender-affirming health care  activities” means one
or more of the activities described in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(b) “Public body” means a  public body as defined in ORS 174.109 and the Oregon Health
and Science University.
(2)(a) Except as provided in ORS 24.500 and 133.747, or as  required by federal law, an of-
ficer, employee or agent of a public  body may not cooperate with, provide information to or
otherwise expend or use time, moneys, facilities, property, equipment, personnel or other
resources to assist a federal law enforcement agency, a law enforcement  agency of another
state, a private citizen or a quasi-law enforcement agent in relation to  an investigation or
inquiry into a legally-protected reproductive or  gender-affirming health care activity, if such
activity would be lawful if it occurred entirely in this state.
(b) Nothing in this  subsection prohibits an officer, employee or agent of a public body
from disclosing information that is responsive to  an investigation or inquiry described in
paragraph (a)  of this subsection to the extent the information is available to the general
public provided the disclosure is made under the same terms  and conditions as the infor-
mation is made available to the general public.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 15.430 is amended to read:
15.430. Notwithstanding ORS 15.440, 15.445 and 15.455,  Oregon law governs noncontractual
claims in the following actions:
(1) Actions in which, after the events  giving rise to the dispute, the parties agree to the appli-
cation of Oregon law.
(2) Actions in which none of the parties raises the issue of applicability of foreign law.
(3) Actions in which the party or parties  who rely on foreign law fail to assist the court in es-
tablishing the relevant provisions of foreign law after being requested by the court to do so.
(4) Actions filed against a public body of the State of Oregon, unless  the application of Oregon
law is waived by a person authorized by Oregon law  to make the waiver on behalf of the public
body.
(5) Actions against an owner, lessor or possessor  of land, buildings or other real property situ-
ated in Oregon that seek to recover for, or to prevent, injury  on that property and arising out of
conduct that occurs in Oregon.
(6) Actions between an employer  and an employee who is primarily employed in Oregon that
arise out of an injury that occurs in Oregon.
(7) Actions for professional  malpractice arising from services rendered entirely in Oregon by
personnel licensed to perform those services under Oregon law.
(8)(a) Actions  against a provider of reproductive health care or gender-affirming treatment[ , as
those terms are defined in ORS 24.500, ] if the reproductive health care or gender-affirming  treatment
at issue was provided  or attempted to be provided  in this state.
(b) Actions against a patient receiving or attempting to receive  reproductive health  care or
gender-affirming treatment if  the reproductive health care or gender-affirming treatment at issue
was [ received] provided or attempted to be provided in this state.
(c) Actions against any person who provides  or attempts  to provide  aid, assistance,
resources , encouragement  or support to a person in providing or receiving or attempting to
provide or receive reproductive health care or gender-affirming treatment  provided in this state.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, reproductive health  care or gender-affirming treat-
ment is provided in the state in which the patient is physically located at the time the ser-
vices are provided.
(e) As used in this subsection, “reproductive health  care” and “gender-affirming treat-
ment” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 24.500.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 24.500 is amended to read:
24.500. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 2
(a) “Gender-affirming treatment” means a procedure, service, drug,  device or product that a
physical or behavioral  health care provider prescribes to treat an individual for incongruence be-
tween the individual’s gender identity and the individual’s sex assignment at birth.
(b) “Reproductive health” means reproductive processes, functions and systems at all stages  of
life.
(c) “Reproductive health care”  includes family planning and contraception, pregnancy termi-
nation services, prenatal, postnatal and delivery care, miscarriage management,  fertility care,
sterilization services, treatments for  sexually transmitted infections and reproductive cancers and
any other health care and medical services related to reproductive health.
(2) A law of another state that authorizes  a person to bring a civil or criminal action against
[a person that ] another person who does any of the following is contrary to the public policy of this
state:
(a) [ Receive ] Receives or  attempts to receive reproductive health care or gender-affirming
treatment;
(b) [ Provide or  attempt] Provides or attempts  to provide reproductive health care or gender-
affirming treatment; or
(c) Knowingly [ engage in conduct that aids or abets ] engages in conduct that  aids or encour-
ages or attempts to aid or encourage  the provision of reproductive health care or gender-
affirming treatment.
(3) Notwithstanding ORCP  38 C, a person may not request that a clerk of court issue a subpoena
for service upon a person to whom a foreign subpoena is  directed if the foreign subpoena relates to
gender-affirming treatment or reproductive health care  services that are permitted under the laws
of this state, unless  the person requesting the subpoena provides a written declaration that the
foreign subpoena relates to:
(a) An out-of-state action founded in tort, contract or statute, for  which a similar claim would
exist under the laws of this state, brought by a  patient or the patient’s authorized legal represen-
tative, for damages suffered by the patient; or
(b) An out-of-state action founded  in contract, and for which a similar claim would exist under
the laws of this state, brought or sought to be enforced by a  party with a contractual relationship
with the person that is the subject of the subpoena.
CONFIDENTIALITY
(Individually Identifiable Information)
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  40.225 to
40.295.
SECTION 7. Privilege regarding reproductive or gender-affirming health care.  (1) As used
in this section:
(a) “Individually identifiable information” has the meaning given that term  in section 9
of this 2026 Act.
(b) “Proceeding” means  a judicial or administrative proceeding, other than a proceeding
directly related to the Oregon Health  Authority’s administration of the state medical as-
sistance program or the programs described in ORS 435.230.
(2)(a) The authority or an agent or employee of the authority  may not be examined in a
proceeding as to  the individually identifiable information of an individual that is acquired by
the authority in  the course of carrying out its duties and responsibilities in administering
the state medical assistance program or the programs described in ORS 435.230.
(b) This section does not apply if the individual consents to  the examination described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 8. Section 9 of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 435.190 to
435.245.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 3
SECTION 9. Confidentiality of individually identifiable information. (1) As used in  this
section, “individually identifiable information” means any health information in any form or
medium that is identifiable to an  individual, including demographic information that identi-
fies the individual, or for which there is a reasonable  basis to believe the information can
be used  to identify an individual, and that relates to applications for or receipt of legally-
protected reproductive or gender-affirming health care activities.
(2) Except to the extent an individual  consents to the information’s disclosure, the
individual’s individually identifiable information obtained by the authority:
(a) Is confidential and not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
(b) May be disclosed  only as necessary and directly connected with the administration
of the state  medical assistance program or the authority’s duties and responsibilities under
ORS 435.230; and
(c) Is confidential,  nondiscoverable and inadmissible in any judicial or administrative
proceeding that is  not directly connected with the authority’s administration of the state
medical assistance program or the programs described in ORS 435.230.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 435.190 is amended to read:
435.190. As used in ORS 435.190 to 435.245:
(1) “Contraception” includes:
(a) Steroidal, chemical, physical or  barrier, natural or permanent methods for preventing the
union of an ovum with  the spermatozoon, or for preventing the subsequent implantation of the fer-
tilized ovum in the uterus;
(b) All postcoital methods, drugs or devices to prevent pregnancy; and
(c) Any other process, device or method to prevent pregnancy.
(2) “Legally-protected reproductive or gender-affirming health care activities” means  one
or more of the activities described in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
[(2)] (3) “Public body” means a public body as defined in ORS 174.109  and the Oregon Health
and Science University.
[(3)] (4) “Reproductive health”  means reproductive processes, functions and systems at all stages
of life.
[(4)] (5) “Reproductive  health care” includes family planning and contraception, pregnancy ter-
mination services, prenatal, postnatal  and delivery care, miscarriage management, fertility care,
sterilization services, treatments for  sexually transmitted infections and reproductive cancers and
any other health care and medical services related to reproductive health.
(Court Records)
SECTION 11.
 ORS 33.420 is amended to read:
33.420. (1) Except as provided in ORS 109.360, before entering a judgment  for a change of name
in the  case of a minor child, the court shall require that written notice of the application for the
change of name  of the minor child be given to the parents of the child, both custodial and non-
custodial, and to any legal guardian of the child.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, notice of an application  for the change of
name of a minor child does not need to be given to a parent of the child  if the other parent of the
child files a verified statement in the change of name proceeding that asserts that the  minor child
has not resided with the other parent and that the other parent has not  contributed or has not tried
to contribute to the support of the child.
(3)(a) In a case to determine an application for change of name of a person under ORS 33.410,
if an applicant  who is a certified adult program participant in the Address Confidentiality Program
under ORS 192.826 requests the court to seal the record  of the case, the court shall seal the record
of the case unless the court issues  an order pursuant to a finding of good cause under ORS 192.848.
(b) This subsection does not apply to an adult applicant appearing as a guardian ad litem for  a
minor child.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 4
[(4) In a case to determine an application for legal change of sex of a person under ORS 33.460,
if an applicant requests the court to seal the record of the case, the court shall seal the record of the
case.]
SECTION 12.  ORS 33.460 is amended to read:
33.460. (1) Application for legal change of sex of a person may be heard and determined  by any
circuit court in this state. A circuit court may order a legal change of sex and enter a judgment
indicating the change of sex if the  individual attests that the individual has undergone surgical,
hormonal or other treatment appropriate  for the individual for the purpose of affirming gender
identity.
(2) The court may order a legal change of sex and enter  the judgment in the same manner as
that provided for change of name of a person under ORS 33.410.
(3) Application for simultaneous change of name and  legal change of sex may be heard and de-
termined by any circuit  court in this state. If a person applies for a change of name under ORS
33.410 at the time the person applies  for a legal change of sex under this section, the court may
order change of name and legal change of sex at the same time and in the same proceeding.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a case to determine an ap-
plication for legal change of sex, including an application for simultaneous  change of name
and legal change of sex, is confidential,  exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to
192.478 and may not be disclosed except:
(A) To a party in the case or the party’s attorney;
(B) To the court;
(C) Pursuant to a court order for  good cause shown, and subject to the provisions of ORS
192.324; or
(D) As required by the court to comply with the notice requirement under ORS 33.420.
(b) An applicant may move the court to make the  case public or to make the register
and certain records in the case public.
(c) The court, upon the motion of the applicant, shall  make confidential a case described
in this subsection or a register and certain records in the case  described in this subsection,
if the case or register and records are not already confidential.
(Public Records Exemptions)
SECTION 13.
 ORS 192.345 is amended to read:
192.345. The following public records are exempt from disclosure  under ORS 192.311 to 192.478
unless the public interest requires disclosure in the particular instance:
(1) Records of a public body pertaining to litigation to which the public body is a  party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the complaint has not  been filed, if the public body shows that such
litigation is reasonably likely to occur. This exemption does  not apply to litigation which has been
concluded, and nothing in this subsection shall  limit any right or opportunity granted by discovery
or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(2) Trade secrets.  “Trade secrets,” as used in this section, may include, but are not limited to,
any formula, plan, pattern, process,  tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production data, or
compilation of information which is not patented, which is  known only to certain individuals within
an organization and which is used in a business it conducts, having  actual or potential commercial
value, and which gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who
do not know or use it.
(3) Investigatory information compiled for  criminal law purposes. The record of an arrest or the
report of a crime shall be disclosed unless and only for so long as there is a clear need to  delay
disclosure in the course of a specific investigation, including the need  to protect the complaining
party or the victim. Nothing in this subsection shall  limit any right constitutionally guaranteed,
or granted by statute, to disclosure or discovery in criminal cases. For purposes  of this subsection,
the record of an arrest or the report of a crime includes, but is not limited to:
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 5
(a) The arrested  person’s name, age, residence, employment, marital status and similar bi-
ographical information;
(b) The offense with which the arrested person is charged;
(c) The conditions of release pursuant to ORS 135.230 to 135.290;
(d) The identity of and biographical information concerning both complaining party and victim;
(e) The identity of the investigating and arresting agency and the length of the investigation;
(f) The circumstances of  arrest, including time, place, resistance, pursuit and weapons used; and
(g) Such information as may be  necessary to enlist public assistance in apprehending fugitives
from justice.
(4) Test questions, scoring keys, and other data  used to administer a licensing examination,
employment, academic or other examination or testing procedure before the  examination is given
and if the examination is to be  used again. Records establishing procedures for and instructing
persons administering, grading or evaluating an examination  or testing procedure are included in
this exemption, to the extent that disclosure would create a risk that the result might be affected.
(5) Information consisting of production records, sale or purchase records or  catch records, or
similar business records of a private concern or enterprise,  required by law to be submitted to or
inspected by a governmental body to allow it to determine fees or assessments payable or to  estab-
lish production quotas, and the amounts of such fees or assessments  payable or paid, to the extent
that such information is in a form that would permit identification  of the individual concern or en-
terprise. This exemption does not include records submitted by long term care facilities as defined
in ORS 442.015 to the state for purposes of reimbursement of expenses  or determining fees for pa-
tient care. Nothing in this  subsection shall limit the use that can be made of such information for
regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding.
(6) Information relating to the appraisal of real estate prior to its acquisition.
(7) The names and signatures of employees who sign authorization cards or  petitions for the
purpose of requesting representation or decertification elections.
(8) Investigatory information relating to any complaint filed under ORS 659A.820 or 659A.825,
until such time as the complaint is resolved  under ORS 659A.835, or a final order is issued under
ORS 659A.850.
(9) Investigatory information relating to any complaint or charge  filed under ORS 243.676 and
663.180.
(10) Records,  reports and other information received or compiled by the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services under ORS 697.732.
(11) Information concerning the location of  archaeological sites or objects as those terms are
defined in ORS 358.905, except if the governing body of an Indian tribe requests  the information and
the need for the  information is related to that Indian tribe’s cultural or religious activities. This
exemption does not include information relating to a site  that is all or part of an existing, commonly
known and publicized tourist facility or attraction.
(12) A personnel discipline action, or materials or documents supporting that action.
(13) Fish and wildlife  information developed pursuant to ORS 496.004, 496.172 and 498.026 or
ORS 496.192 and 564.100, regarding the habitat, location or population of any threatened  species or
endangered species.
(14) Writings prepared by or under the direction of faculty of public  educational institutions, in
connection with research, until publicly released, copyrighted or patented.
(15) Computer programs developed or purchased by or for any public body for its own  use. As
used in this subsection, “computer program” means a series of instructions or statements  which
permit the functioning of a computer system in a manner designed  to provide storage, retrieval and
manipulation of data from  such computer system, and any associated documentation and source
material that  explain how to operate the computer program. “Computer program” does not include:
(a) The original data, including but not limited to numbers, text, voice, graphics and images;
(b) Analyses, compilations and  other manipulated forms of the original data produced by use of
the program; or
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 6
(c) The mathematical and statistical  formulas which would be used if the manipulated forms of
the original data were to be produced manually.
(16) Data and information provided by participants to mediation under ORS 36.256.
(17) Investigatory information relating to any complaint or charge  filed under ORS chapter 654,
until a final administrative determination is made or, if a citation is issued, until  an employer re-
ceives notice of any citation.
(18) Specific operational plans in connection with an anticipated threat to  individual or public
safety for deployment and use of personnel and equipment, prepared or used by  a public body, if
public disclosure of the plans would endanger an individual’s life or physical safety  or jeopardize a
law enforcement activity.
(19)(a) Audits or audit reports required of a telecommunications carrier. As  used in this para-
graph, “audit or audit report” means any external or internal  audit or audit report pertaining to a
telecommunications carrier, as defined in ORS 133.721, or pertaining to a corporation having an af-
filiated interest, as defined  in ORS 759.390, with a telecommunications carrier that is intended to
make the operations of the entity more efficient,  accurate or compliant with applicable rules, pro-
cedures or standards, that may include self-criticism and that has been  filed by the telecommuni-
cations carrier or affiliate under compulsion of state  law. “Audit or audit report” does not mean an
audit of a cost study that would be discoverable in a  contested case proceeding and that is not
subject to a protective order; and
(b) Financial statements. As used  in this paragraph, “financial statement” means a financial
statement of a nonregulated corporation having an affiliated  interest, as defined in ORS 759.390,
with a telecommunications carrier, as defined in ORS 133.721.
(20) The residence address of an elector  if authorized under ORS 247.965 and subject to ORS
247.967.
(21) The following records, communications and information submitted to a housing authority
as defined in ORS  456.005, or to an urban renewal agency as defined in ORS 457.010, by applicants
for and recipients of loans, grants and tax credits:
(a) Personal and corporate financial statements and information, including tax returns;
(b) Credit reports;
(c) Project appraisals, excluding appraisals obtained in the course of transactions involving  an
interest in real estate that is acquired, leased, rented,  exchanged, transferred or otherwise disposed
of as part of the project, but only after the transactions have closed and are concluded;
(d) Market studies and analyses;
(e) Articles of incorporation, partnership agreements and operating agreements;
(f) Commitment letters;
(g) Project pro forma statements;
(h) Project cost certifications and cost data;
(i) Audits;
(j) Project tenant correspondence requested to be confidential;
(k) Tenant files relating to certification; and
(L) Housing assistance payment requests.
(22) Records or information that, if disclosed, would allow a person to:
(a) Gain unauthorized access to buildings or other property;
(b) Identify those areas of structural  or operational vulnerability that would permit unlawful
disruption to, or interference with, services; or
(c) Disrupt, interfere with  or gain unauthorized access to public funds or to information proc-
essing, communication or telecommunication systems, including the  information contained in the
systems, that are used or operated by a public body.
(23) Records or information that would reveal or  otherwise identify security measures, or
weaknesses or potential weaknesses in security measures, taken or recommended  to be taken to
protect:
(a) An individual;
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 7
(b) Buildings or other property;
(c) Information processing, communication or telecommunication systems, including the  infor-
mation contained in the systems; or
(d) Those operations of the  Oregon State Lottery the security of which are subject to study and
evaluation under ORS 461.180 (6).
(24) Personal information held by or under the  direction of officials of the Oregon Health and
Science University or a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 about a person who has or who is
interested in donating money or property to the Oregon  Health and Science University or a public
university, if the information is related  to the family of the person, personal assets of the person
or is incidental information not related to the donation.
(25) The home address, professional address and telephone number of a person who  has or who
is interested in donating money or property to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(26) Records of the name  and address of a person who files a report with or pays an assessment
to a commodity commission established under ORS 576.051 to 576.455, the  Oregon Beef Council
created under ORS 577.210 or the Oregon Wheat Commission created under ORS 578.030.
(27) Information  provided to, obtained by or used by a public body to authorize, originate, re-
ceive or authenticate a transfer of funds, including but not limited  to a credit card number, payment
card expiration date, password, financial institution account number and financial institution routing
number.
(28) Social Security numbers as provided in ORS 107.840.
(29) The electronic mail  address of a student who attends a public university listed in ORS
352.002 or Oregon Health and Science University.
(30) The name, home address, professional address or location of a person that is  engaged in,
or that provides goods or services for, medical research  at Oregon Health and Science University
that is  conducted using animals other than rodents. This subsection does not apply to Oregon Health
and Science University press releases, websites or other publications circulated to the general
public.
(31) If requested by a public safety officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, or a county  juvenile
department employee who is charged with and primarily performs duties related to  the custody,
control or supervision of adjudicated youths confined in a detention facility, as  defined in ORS
419A.004:
(a) The home  address and home telephone number of the public safety officer or county juvenile
department employee contained in the voter registration records for the officer or employee.
(b) The home  address and home telephone number of the public safety officer or county juvenile
department employee contained in records of the Department of  Public Safety Standards and
Training.
(c) The name of the public  safety officer or county juvenile department employee contained in
county real property assessment or taxation records. This exemption:
(A) Applies only to the name of the officer or employee and any  other owner of the property in
connection with a specific property identified by the officer or employee in a  request for exemption
from disclosure;
(B) Applies only to records that may be made immediately available to the  public upon request
in person, by telephone or using the Internet;
(C) Applies until the officer or employee requests termination of the exemption;
(D) Does not apply to disclosure of records among public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109 for
governmental purposes; and
(E) May not result in liability for the county if the name of  the officer or employee is disclosed
after a request for exemption from disclosure is made under this subsection.
(32) Unless the public records request is made by a financial institution,  as defined in ORS
706.008, consumer finance company licensed under ORS chapter 725, mortgage banker  or mortgage
broker licensed under  ORS 86A.095 to 86A.198, or title company for business purposes, records de-
scribed in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, if the exemption from disclosure of the records is sought
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 8
by an individual described in paragraph (b) of this subsection using the procedure  described in
paragraph (c) of this subsection:
(a) The home address,  home or cellular telephone number or personal electronic mail address
contained in the records of any public body that has received the request that is set forth in:
(A) A warranty deed, deed of trust, mortgage, lien, deed of reconveyance, release,  satisfaction,
substitution of trustee, easement, dog license, marriage license or  military discharge record that is
in the possession of the county clerk; or
(B) Any public record of a public body other than the county clerk.
(b) The individual claiming the exemption from disclosure must be a district  attorney, a deputy
district attorney, the Attorney General or an assistant attorney general, the United States Attorney
for the District of Oregon or an assistant United States attorney  for the District of Oregon, a city
attorney who engages in the prosecution  of criminal matters or a deputy city attorney who engages
in the prosecution of criminal matters.
(c) The individual claiming the exemption from disclosure must do so  by filing the claim in
writing with the public body  for which the exemption from disclosure is being claimed on a form
prescribed by the public body. Unless the claim is filed with the  county clerk, the claim form shall
list the public  records in the possession of the public body to which the exemption applies. The ex-
emption applies until the  individual claiming the exemption requests termination of the exemption
or ceases to qualify for the exemption.
(33) The following voluntary conservation agreements and reports:
(a) Land management plans required for voluntary stewardship agreements  entered into under
ORS 541.973; and
(b) Written agreements relating to the conservation of greater sage grouse entered into  volun-
tarily by owners or occupiers of land with a soil and water  conservation district under ORS 568.550.
(34) Sensitive  business records or financial or commercial information of the State Accident In-
surance Fund Corporation that is not customarily provided to business competitors.  This exemption
does not:
(a) Apply to the formulas for determining dividends to be paid to  employers insured by the State
Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(b) Apply to contracts for advertising, public relations or lobbying services or to documents  re-
lated to the formation of such contracts;
(c) Apply to group insurance contracts  or to documents relating to the formation of such con-
tracts, except that employer account records shall remain exempt from disclosure  as provided in
ORS 192.355 (35); or
(d) Provide the basis for opposing  the discovery of documents in litigation pursuant to the ap-
plicable rules of civil procedure.
(35) Records of the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training relating to investi-
gations conducted under ORS 181A.640 or 181A.870 (6), until the department issues the  report de-
scribed in ORS 181A.640 or 181A.870.
(36) A medical examiner’s report, autopsy report or laboratory test  report ordered by a medical
examiner under ORS 146.117.
(37) Any document or other information related to an audit of a public body, as  defined in ORS
174.109, that is in the custody of an auditor or audit organization operating under nationally  re-
cognized  government  auditing standards, until the auditor or audit organization issues a final audit
report in accordance with those standards or the audit is  abandoned. This exemption does not pro-
hibit disclosure of a draft audit report  that is provided to the audited entity for the entity’s response
to the audit findings.
(38)(a) Personally identifiable information collected as part of an electronic fare  collection sys-
tem of a mass transit system.
(b) The exemption from disclosure in paragraph (a) of this subsection  does not apply to public
records that have attributes of anonymity that are sufficient, or that are aggregated  into groupings
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 9
that are broad enough, to ensure that persons cannot be identified by disclosure of the public  re-
cords.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Electronic fare  collection system” means the software and hardware used for, associated
with or relating to the collection of transit fares for a mass transit  system, including but not limited
to computers, radio communication systems, personal mobile devices, wearable  technology, fare in-
struments, information technology, data storage or collection equipment,  or other equipment or im-
provements.
(B) “Mass transit system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 267.010.
(C) “Personally identifiable information” means all information  relating to a person that ac-
quires or uses a transit pass or other fare payment medium in connection  with an electronic fare
collection system, including but not limited to:
(i) Customer account information, date of birth, telephone number, physical  address, electronic
mail address, credit  or debit card information, bank account information, Social Security or taxpayer
identification number or other identification number, transit pass or fare payment medium balances
or history, or similar personal information; or
(ii) Travel dates, travel times, frequency of use, travel locations, service types or vehicle use,
or similar travel information.
(39)(a) If requested by a civil code enforcement officer:
(A) The home address and home telephone number of the civil code  enforcement officer con-
tained in the voter registration records for the officer.
(B) The name of the civil code enforcement officer contained in county  real property assessment
or taxation records. This exemption:
(i) Applies only to the name of the civil code enforcement officer and any other  owner of the
property in connection with a specific  property identified by the officer in a request for exemption
from disclosure;
(ii) Applies only to records that  may be made immediately available to the public upon request
in person, by telephone or using the Internet;
(iii) Applies until the civil code enforcement officer requests termination of the exemption;
(iv) Does not apply  to disclosure of records among public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109 for
governmental purposes; and
(v) May not result in liability for the county  if the name of the civil code enforcement officer
is disclosed after a request for exemption from disclosure is made under this subsection.
(b) As used in this subsection, “civil code enforcement officer” means an  employee of a public
body, as defined in ORS 174.109, who is charged with enforcing laws or ordinances relating to land
use, zoning, use of rights-of-way, solid waste, hazardous waste, sewage treatment and  disposal or the
state building code.
(40) Audio or video recordings,  whether digital or analog, resulting from a law enforcement
officer’s operation of a video camera worn upon the  officer’s person that records the officer’s
interactions with members of the public while the officer is on  duty. When a recording described in
this subsection is subject to disclosure, the following apply:
(a) Recordings  that have been sealed in a court’s record of a court proceeding or otherwise or-
dered by a court not to be disclosed may not be disclosed.
(b) A request  for disclosure under this subsection must identify the approximate date and time
of an incident for which the recordings are requested and be reasonably tailored to include only that
material for which a public interest requires disclosure.
(c) A video recording disclosed under this subsection must, prior to disclosure, be edited in a
manner as to render the faces of all persons within the recording unidentifiable.
(41) The contents of tips reported to a tip line, as defined  in ORS 339.329. However, personally
identifiable information, as defined in ORS 339.329, is  not subject to public interest balancing under
this section and remains exempt from disclosure except as provided in ORS 339.329.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 10
(42) Residential addresses of individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities residing
in adult foster homes as  defined in ORS 443.705 or residential training facilities or residential
training homes as those terms are defined in ORS 443.400.
(43) The name, image, home telephone number,  home address, professional address or location
of an individual who  is [ authorized to provide physical and behavioral health care services in this state
and who provides ] engaged in the provision of  reproductive and gender-affirming  health care ser-
vices.
MALPRACTICE INSURANCE AND LICENSING
SECTION 14.  ORS 676.612, as operative until July 1, 2026, is amended to read:
676.612. (1) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, and in  the manner prescribed in ORS chapter
183 for contested cases and as specified  in ORS 675.385, 676.660, 676.685, 676.745, 676.777, 676.825,
678.780, 680.535, 681.733, 681.755, 687.445, 688.734, 688.836,  690.167, 690.407, 691.477, 694.147 and
700.111, the Health Licensing Office may refuse  to issue or renew, may suspend or revoke or may
otherwise condition or limit an authorization or  may discipline or place on probation an authori-
zation holder for commission of the prohibited acts listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A person subject to the authority of a board, council or program  listed in ORS 676.565
commits a prohibited act if the person engages in:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material facts or deception  in applying for or ob-
taining an authorization to practice in this state, or in any written or oral communication to the
office concerning the issuance or retention of the authorization.
(b) Using, causing or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature,  testi-
monial, guarantee, warranty, label, insignia or  any other representation, however disseminated or
published, that is false, misleading or deceptive.
(c) Making a representation that the authorization holder knew or should have  known is false
or misleading regarding skill or the efficacy or value of treatment or remedy administered  by the
authorization  holder.
(d) Practicing under a  false, misleading or deceptive name, or impersonating another authori-
zation holder.
(e) Permitting a person other than the authorization holder to use the authorization.
(f) Practicing  with a physical or mental condition that presents an unreasonable risk of harm
to the authorization holder or to the person or property of others in  the course of performing the
authorization holder’s duties.
(g) Practicing while under  the influence of alcohol, cannabis, controlled substances or other
skill-impairing substances, or engaging in the illegal use of  controlled substances or other skill-
impairing substances so as to create a risk  of harm to the person or property of others in the course
of performing the duties of an authorization holder.
(h) Failing to properly and reasonably accept responsibility for the actions of employees.
(i) Employing,  directly or indirectly, any suspended, uncertified, unlicensed or unregistered per-
son to practice a regulated  occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils
and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(j) Unprofessional conduct, negligence, incompetence, repeated violations  or any departure from
or failure to conform to standards of practice in performing services  or practicing in a regulated
occupation or profession subject  to the authority of the boards, councils and programs listed under
ORS 676.565.
(k) Except as  provided in ORS 687.445,  conviction of any criminal offense, subject to ORS
670.280. A copy of the record of conviction, certified by the clerk of the court entering the con-
viction, is conclusive evidence of the conviction. A plea of  no contest or an admission of guilt is a
conviction for purposes of this paragraph.
(L) Failing to report any adverse action, as required by statute or rule,  taken against the au-
thorization holder by another regulatory jurisdiction or  any peer review body, health care institu-
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 11
tion, professional association, governmental  agency, law enforcement agency or court for acts or
conduct similar to acts or  conduct that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(m) Violation of a statute regulating an occupation or  profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(n) Violation of any rule regulating an occupation or  profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(o) Failing to cooperate with the office in any investigation, inspection or request  for informa-
tion.
(p) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing an authorization  to practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(q) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing any record related to practice in  a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(r) Failing to pay an outstanding civil penalty or fee that is due or failing to meet the terms  of
any order issued by the office that has become final.
(3) For the purpose of requesting  a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the office may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for an authorization;
(b) Applying for renewal of an authorization; or
(c) Under investigation by the office.
(4) If the office places an authorization holder on  probation under subsection (1) of this section,
the office, in consultation with the  appropriate board, council or program, may determine and at any
time modify the conditions of the probation.
(5) If an authorization is suspended, the  authorization holder may not practice during the term
of suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the authorization may  be reinstated
by the office if the conditions of  suspension no longer exist and the authorization holder has satis-
fied all requirements in the relevant statutes or administrative rules for issuance, renewal  or rein-
statement.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 676.612 is amended to read:
676.612. (1) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, and in  the manner prescribed in ORS chapter
183 for contested cases and as specified  in ORS 675.385, 676.660, 676.685, 676.745, 676.777, 676.825,
678.780, 679.720, 680.535, 681.733, 681.755, 687.445, 688.734, 688.836, 690.167, 690.407, 691.477, 694.147
and 700.111, the Health  Licensing Office may refuse to issue or renew, may suspend or revoke or
may otherwise condition or limit an  authorization or may discipline or place on probation an au-
thorization holder for commission of the prohibited acts listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A person subject to  the authority of a board, council or program listed in ORS 676.565
commits a prohibited act if the person engages in:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material  facts or deception in applying for or ob-
taining an authorization to practice in this state, or in any written or oral communication to the
office concerning the issuance or retention of the authorization.
(b) Using,  causing or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature, testi-
monial, guarantee, warranty, label, insignia or any  other representation, however disseminated or
published, that is false, misleading or deceptive.
(c) Making a representation  that the authorization holder knew or should have known is false
or misleading regarding  skill or the efficacy or value of treatment or remedy administered by the
authorization holder.
(d) Practicing under a false, misleading or deceptive name, or  impersonating another authori-
zation holder.
(e) Permitting a person other than the authorization holder to use the authorization.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 12
(f) Practicing with a physical or mental condition that presents an unreasonable risk of  harm
to the authorization holder or to  the person or property of others in the course of performing the
authorization holder’s duties.
(g) Practicing while under  the influence of alcohol, cannabis, controlled substances or other
skill-impairing substances, or engaging in the illegal use of  controlled substances or other skill-
impairing substances so as to create a risk  of harm to the person or property of others in the course
of performing the duties of an authorization holder.
(h) Failing to properly and reasonably accept responsibility for the actions of employees.
(i) Employing,  directly or indirectly, any suspended, uncertified, unlicensed or unregistered per-
son to practice a regulated  occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils
and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(j) Unprofessional conduct, negligence, incompetence, repeated violations  or any departure from
or failure to conform to standards of practice in performing services  or practicing in a regulated
occupation or profession subject  to the authority of the boards, councils and programs listed under
ORS 676.565.
(k) Except as  provided in ORS 687.445,  conviction of any criminal offense, subject to ORS
670.280. A copy of the record of conviction, certified by the clerk of the court entering the con-
viction, is conclusive evidence of the conviction. A plea of  no contest or an admission of guilt is a
conviction for purposes of this paragraph.
(L) Failing to report any adverse action, as required by statute or rule,  taken against the au-
thorization holder by another regulatory jurisdiction or  any peer review body, health care institu-
tion, professional association, governmental  agency, law enforcement agency or court for acts or
conduct similar to acts or  conduct that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(m) Violation of a statute regulating an occupation or  profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(n) Violation of any rule regulating an occupation  or profession subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(o) Failing to  cooperate with the office in any investigation, inspection or request for informa-
tion.
(p) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or  furnishing an authorization to practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(q) Selling or  fraudulently obtaining or furnishing any record related to practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and  programs listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(r) Failing to pay an outstanding civil penalty or fee that is due or failing to meet the terms  of
any order issued by the office that has become final.
(3) For the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide  criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the office may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for an authorization;
(b) Applying for renewal of an authorization; or
(c) Under investigation by the office.
(4) If the office places an authorization holder on  probation under subsection (1) of this section,
the office, in consultation with the  appropriate board, council or program, may determine and at any
time modify the conditions of the probation.
(5) If an authorization is suspended, the authorization holder  may not practice during the term
of suspension. Upon  the expiration of the term of suspension, the authorization may be reinstated
by the office if the conditions of suspension no longer exist  and the authorization holder has satis-
fied all requirements  in the relevant statutes or administrative rules for issuance, renewal or rein-
statement.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 687.445 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 13
687.445. (1) In the manner prescribed in ORS chapter 183 for contested cases and in consultation
with the Health Licensing Office  and subject to subsection (2) of this  section , the State Board
of Direct Entry Midwifery may impose a form of discipline specified in ORS 676.612 and 676.992  (1)
and (2) against any person practicing direct entry midwifery for any  of the grounds listed in ORS
676.612 and for any violation  of the provisions of ORS 687.405 to 687.495 or the rules adopted under
ORS 687.405 to 687.495.
(2) The board may not suspend  or revoke a person’s license to practice direct entry
midwifery, or refuse to grant a license  to a person to practice direct entry midwifery, be-
cause of a conviction or disciplinary action resulting  solely from the person’s provision of a
reproductive or gender-affirming health care service that is otherwise lawful  in this state
but unlawful in the jurisdiction in which the person provided  the service, so long as the
service provided was performed in accordance with  the standard of care applicable to the
service.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 17. Applicability. The amendments to ORS 33.420 and 33.460 by sections 11 and
12 of this 2026 Act apply to an  application for change of name, application for legal change
of sex or application for simultaneous change of name and legal  change of sex that is filed
with the court on or after July  1, 2026, and, upon motion of the applicant, to an application
for legal change of sex or  application for simultaneous change of name and legal change of
sex that was filed with the court before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 18. Delayed operative date. (1) The amendments to ORS 33.420 and 33.460 by
sections 11 and 12 of this 2026 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Judicial Department may take any action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the department by the  amendments to ORS 33.420 and 33.460 by
sections 11 and 12 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 19.
Captions. The unit and section captions used in this  2026 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 20. Emergency. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate  preservation
of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared  to exist, and this 2026 Act
takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 14
Passed by House February 16, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4088 (HB 4088-A) Page 15